Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1810.02
Primary care practitioner, defined.

Primary care practitioner means a physician licensed pursuant to section 38-2026 or sections 38-2029 to 38-2033 who provides primary care services, a nurse practitioner licensed pursuant to section 38-2317 who provides primary care services, or a physician assistant licensed pursuant to section 38-2049 who provides primary care services under a collaborative agreement with the supervision of a physician.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 37.